North Carolina, session 2025, HB841.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Study. – The North Carolina Collaboratory (Collaboratory) shall
conduct a comprehensive study on shellfish aquaculture regulations to ensure a balanced
approach between economic development, environmental protection, and public access to coastal
waters. The study shall evaluate all of the following:
(1) The effectiveness of existing regulations and permitting governing shellfish
aquaculture leases.
(2) The history and policy bases for current permanent and temporary
moratoriums and whether to lift or modify existing moratoriums or enact
additional moratoriums on shellfish aquaculture leases.
(3) Best practices from other states for managing shellfish aquaculture.
(4) The economic impact of shellfish aquaculture expansion on coastal economies
and tourism.
(5) Potential and actual conflicts between shellfish aquaculture operations and
private property values, commercial or recreational fishing, boating, and other
coastal land and water uses.
(6) Environmental considerations, including water quality, seagrass protection,
and marine habitat impacts due to the presence or absence of shellfish
aquaculture in various coastal habitats.
(7) Regulatory, permitting, and environmental impact differences between
bottom and column leases.
(8) The role of local governments in shellfish aquaculture leases located in or
adjacent to their jurisdictions.
(9) Recommendations for a statewide framework on the regulation and permitting
of shellfish aquaculture that benefits the industry and the State while
mitigating conflicts with users of public trust waters.
SECTION 2. Required Consultations. – In conducting its study, the Collaboratory
shall consult with the North Carolina Division of Marine Fisheries, the Marine Fisheries
Commission, and other stakeholders, including shellfish growers, commercial and recreational
fishermen, property owners, and coastal area local governments.
*H841-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. Report. – The Collaboratory shall submit an interim report with
preliminary findings to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural
and Economic Resources no later than December 1, 2025, and a final report, including any
recommendations for legislative or regulatory changes, by May 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Effective Date. – This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 841-First Edition